District of Columbia statutes.
8-1022

Repealed

Minimum recycled content surcharge.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 25
as added Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-208, § 2, 37 DCR 8458
July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-130, § 2(b), 39 DCR 4054
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
1981 Ed., § 6-3422.
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.